Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2864
Temporary educational permit; disciplinary actions; appeal.

Any temporary educational permit granted under the authority of the Pharmacy Practice Act may be suspended, limited, or revoked by the department, with the recommendation of the board, at any time upon a finding that the reasons for issuing such permit no longer exist or that the person to whom such permit has been issued is no longer qualified to hold such permit or for any reason for which a pharmacist license could be suspended, limited, or revoked. A hearing on the suspension, limitation, or revocation of the temporary educational permit by the department shall be held in the same manner as for the denial of a pharmacist license. The final order of the director may be appealed, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1978, LB 675, § 15;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 119;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 464;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 124;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 41;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.31;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 348;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 960.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.